Utah, session 2026, HB413.
Section 1. Section 54-17-1201 is enacted to read:12. Surplus Interconnection Service54-17-1201. Surplus interconnection service -- Analysis and plan -- Cost recovery.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Generator" means a facility that holds a large generator interconnection agreement.(b)"Interconnection service" means the service provided by a transmission provider associated with interconnecting a generator to the transmission system and enabling the transmission system to receive electric energy and capacity from the generator at the point of interconnection.(c)"Large generator interconnection agreement" means an agreement that establishes the terms and conditions under which a generator with a capacity greater than 20 megawatts interconnects with the transmission system.(d)"Point of interconnection" means the location where a generator connects to the transmission system.(e)"Surplus interconnection service" means any unneeded portion of interconnection service established in a large generator interconnection agreement, such that if surplus interconnection service is utilized, the interconnection service limit at the point of interconnection would remain the same.(2)In any integrated resource plan filing, an affected electrical utility shall:(a)analyze generators owned by the affected electrical utility for potential surplus interconnection service opportunities, including:(i)the total amount of unused capacity at the generator; and(ii)whether the generator has any physical site characteristics that make surplus interconnection service prudent, or that may render surplus interconnection service unworkable; (b)consider surplus interconnection service in the action plan as described in Section 54-17-301; and(c)include the analysis described in Subsection (2)(a) in the filing to the commission.(3)An affected electrical utility may solicit information from non-utility owned facilities to determine the potential for surplus interconnection service.(4)The commission shall encourage an affected electrical utility to include surplus interconnection service in an integrated resource plan.(5)If the commission determines, based on the analysis and action plan provided by an affected electrical utility under Subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b), that the deployment of surplus interconnection service is cost-effective, the commission shall approve the affected electrical utility's recovery of the prudently incurred costs of surplus interconnection service projects.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.